Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 6 Names, Registered Offices, and Advertising

7-1-130.
Permissible names.

The name of a financial institution shall not contain the words “Government,” “Official,” “Federal,” “National,” or “United States” or any abbreviation of any such words and shall not in the opinion of the department:

Be indistinguishable from the corporate name of another financial institution conducting a banking business in this state as reflected in the records of the department; or

Contain any word which may lead to the conclusion that the financial institution is authorized to perform any act or conduct any business which it is unauthorized or forbidden to perform by law, its articles, or otherwise.

A financial institution may, without regard to subsection (a) of this Code section, use:

Its name in use on April 1, 1975;

A name in use on April 1, 1975, by another financial institution which is adopted by:

A financial institution which is the resulting institution in a plan of merger or consolidation to which the institution using the name is a party; or

A financial institution which is incorporated under this chapter in pursuance of a plan of segregating the banking business and the trust business of the institution using the name; or

A name of another financial institution already transacting business with the consent of the latter institution, provided that the names are distinguishable in the records of the Secretary of State.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-601, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 10.

Cross references.

Further restrictions on use of names by banks and trust companies, §

7-1-243

.

Restriction on use of terms “savings and loan,” “building and loan,” §

7-1-779

.

Permissible corporate names generally, §

14-2-401

.

Use of corporate names by Secretary of State corporations, §§

14-4-22

,

14-4-25

.

7-1-131.
Reservation of name; term.

The exclusive right to use a corporate name permitted to be used by a financial institution may be reserved by a person intending to incorporate such an institution, by a corporation intending to engage in business in this state as a financial institution, by a financial institution intending to change its name, or by a national bank, a federal credit union, or a savings and loan association intending to convert into a financial institution organized under the laws of this state.

Such reservation may be made by filing with the department a letter form application to reserve a specified name. If the department concludes that the use of the name complies with the requirements of Code Section 7-1-130, is otherwise consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter, and is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name of any other corporation, limited partnership, or limited liability company, it shall approve the name and notify the Secretary of State to issue such name reservation.

The right to the exclusive use of a name reserved pursuant to this Code section may be transferred to anyone who would be entitled to reserve such name under this Code section except for such prior reservation by filing with the department a notice of the transfer which shall be executed by the transferor who reserved the name and which shall set forth the name and address of the transferee. The department shall send a copy of such notice to the Secretary of State.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the process set forth in this Code section shall be the exclusive process for reserving the corporate name of a financial institution. Such reservation shall be valid for a period of six months.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-602, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 14; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1717, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 11; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 1/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “limited liability company” for “professional association” in the second sentence of subsection (b) and added the last sentence of subsection (d).

Cross references.

Use of corporate names by Secretary of State corporations, §§

14-4-22

,

14-4-25

.

7-1-132.
Registered agent and office.

Every financial institution shall continuously maintain a registered agent and a registered office. Such agent and office shall be located in a county in this state where the financial institution is authorized to conduct its general business; and, in the case of financial institutions subject to Chapter 2 or 3 of Title 14, such agent and office shall be the same as is required under those chapters.

Not later than September 30, 1998, every financial institution shall file with the department a statement designating the name of its registered agent and the place of its registered office by street, post office address, and county. In the event of the failure of an institution to file said statement, the registered agent shall be the chief executive officer of the bank and the registered office of the institution shall be the business address where the chief executive officer is located.

A financial institution may change, and a new financial institution may establish, its registered agent and the location of its registered office by filing a statement with the department designating the name of the new registered agent or the street, post office address, and county of its new registered office or both, provided that no change in the registered agent or office shall affect actions or proceedings commenced before the time of said change.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall affect the obligation of a financial institution to file information with the Secretary of State.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-603, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 12.

Cross references.

Maintenance of office in state by international bank agency not transacting a banking business in state, §

7-1-721

.

7-1-133.
Prohibited advertising.

No person or corporation doing business in this state shall advertise in or through any newspaper, radio, television, letters, circulars, billheads, or in any way or through any medium seeking to induce any person to purchase an instrument which is purported to be insured or guaranteed in a manner comparable to an insured deposit or share account in any financial institution authorized to have such deposits or accounts when in fact such instrument does not possess comparable insurance coverage as determined by the department. Whenever any person, firm, or corporation doing business in this state shall compare, in any such advertising media, an investment or a return on an investment, except an investment or return on an investment in the form of a deposit or share account, to a deposit or share account or a return on a deposit or share account in an authorized financial institution, it shall be clearly stated in such advertising or solicitation that the investment is not a deposit insured by a public body of the United States or of this state.

No person or corporation shall use the terms “savings,” “savings account,” “deposit,” or “withdrawal” or any equivalent thereof in any advertisement as above described in subsection (a) of this Code section indicating reference to instruments issued by or to be issued by the person or corporation.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-204.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 534, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-604, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Cross references.

Duty of bank to post notice if deposit insurance maintained by bank is less than amounts insured by Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, §

7-1-244

.

False advertising generally, §

10-1-420

et seq.

7-1-134.
Unfair competition, unfair trade practice, and trade name and trademark laws unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall abrogate or limit the law as to unfair competition or unfair trade practice nor derogate from the common law or principles of equity or the statutes of this state or of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect trade names and trademarks.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-605, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Cross references.

Deceptive or unfair trade practices generally, §

10-1-370

et seq.